Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-160
Bonded certificate of title; fee.

For each bonded certificate of title issued for a vehicle, the fee shall be fifty dollars, which shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 60.